Massachusetts, session 194th, H368.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 13 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section 42 and 
inserting in place thereof the following section:- 
Section 42. There shall be a board of registration of cosmetology and barbering to consist 
of 9 members who shall be appointed by the governor, 1 of whom shall be designated as 
chairperson by a majority vote of the board. Members shall be appointed for terms of 3 years; 
provided, however, that any person designated to fill a vacancy shall be appointed only for the 
remainder of the unexpired term of the member so replaced. Upon the expiration of a term of 
office, a board member may continue to serve until a successor has been appointed and qualified. 

of 2 9  The governor may remove the chairperson or other member of the board for neglect of 
duty or malfeasance or upon a conviction of a felony or crime of moral turpitude. No board 
member shall participate in any matter before the board in which the member has a pecuniary 
interest, personal bias or other conflict. 
The governor shall appoint members to the board from among candidates who meet the 
following qualifications:- (i) 8 members shall be licensees of the board, in compliance with 
sections 87T to 87KK, inclusive, of chapter 112, 1 of whom shall own a licensed cosmetology 
school or post-secondary institution for at least 5 years, 1 of whom shall be a cosmetologist for at 
least 5 years, 1 of whom shall be a licensed manicurist for at least 5 years, 1 of whom shall be a 
licensed vocational educator from the public sector who has taught cosmetology or barbering for 
at least 5 years, 2 of whom shall be licensed master barbers for at least 5 years, 1 of whom shall 
be a licensed electrologist for at least 5 years and 1 of whom shall be a licensed aesthetician for 
at least 5 years; and (ii) 1 member shall be a representative of the general public and shall have 
no direct affiliation with the practice of cosmetology, barbering or electrology.